Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202545-378
Cease and desist order; hearing; judicial review; enforcement; fine.

(1) The department may order any person to cease and desist whenever the department determines that the person has violated any provision of the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act. Upon entry of a cease and desist order, the director shall promptly notify the affected person that such order has been entered, of the reasons for such order, and that upon receipt, within fifteen business days after the date of the order, of written request from the affected person a hearing will be scheduled within thirty business days after the date of receipt of the written request unless the parties consent to a later date or the hearing officer sets a later date for good cause. If a hearing is not requested and none is ordered by the director, the order shall remain in effect until it is modified or vacated.

(2) The director may vacate or modify a cease and desist order if he or she finds that the conditions which caused its entry have changed or that it is otherwise in the public interest to do so.

(3) A person aggrieved by a cease and desist order of the director may obtain judicial review of the order in the manner prescribed in the Administrative Procedure Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department under the act. The director may obtain an order from the district court of Lancaster County for the enforcement of the cease and desist order.

(4) A person who violates a cease and desist order of the director may, after notice and hearing and upon further order of the director, be subject to a penalty of not more than five thousand dollars for each act in violation of the cease and desist order. The department shall remit fines collected under this section to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2025, LB474, § 99.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.